District of Columbia statutes.
7-761.06b

Reports and notices to be made available to the public.

The Department shall make all reports and notices required under this chapter available on its website within one business day of publication, and shall provide copies to the public upon request.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-264, § 106b
as added Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 5071(b), 57 DCR 181
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5071(b) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5071(b) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).